Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 194 Human Resources

194.010.
Cabinet for Human Resources — Functions. [Repealed.]

194.020.
Secretary as chief officer. [Repealed.]

194.025.
Power and authority of secretary. [Repealed.]

194.030.
Major organizational units of cabinet. [Repealed.]

194.040.
Internal organization of offices and bureaus. [Repealed].

194.050.
Execution of policies, plans, and programs — Administrative regulations — Fees. [Repealed.]

194.060.
Confidentiality of records and reports. [Repealed.]

194.070.
Utilizing community resources for delivery of services. [Repealed.]

194.080.
Cost allocation plan. [Repealed.]

194.090.
Citizen advisory bodies. [Repealed.]

194.100.
Annual joint conference of citizen advisory bodies. [Repealed.]

194.110.
Bodies attached for administrative and support purposes. [Repealed.]

194.120.
Bodies attached to cabinet with statutory authority to issue administrative regulations. [Repealed.]

194.130.
Limitation on administrative processes. [Repealed.]

194.135.
Developmental Disabilities Planning Council — Members — Duties. [Repealed.]

194.140.
Special subcommittees. [Repealed.]

194.150.
State officials as voting members of citizens’ councils. [Repealed.]

194.160.
Alternates or representatives for boards, councils, committees, and similar bodies. [Repealed.]

194.170.
Secretary’s authority to create special task forces, advisory committees, and citizens’ panels. [Repealed.]

194.180.
Rules and regulations of various bodies. [Repealed.]

194.190.
Gifts and grants. [Repealed.]

194.200.
Compensation and expenses of members of councils. [Repealed.]

194.210.
Transfer of functions of councils and committees. [Repealed.]

194.220.
Transfer of other agencies’ functions to cabinet.

Except as otherwise provided in 1974 Acts ch. 74, all authorities, functions, activities, programs, powers, and duties vested in the Department of Child Welfare, the Department of Economic Security, the Department of Health, the Department of Mental Health, the Commission on Aging, the Commission on Children and Youth, the Commission for Handicapped Children, the Office of Economic Opportunity, the Division of Disability Determination of the Department of Education, and the Employment Agency Licensure Program of the Department of Labor are hereby transferred to the cabinet and shall be vested in its organizational structure as directed by the secretary.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 23; 1980, ch. 118, § 8, effective July 15, 1980.

194.225.
Transfer of veterans’ affairs functions to Center for Veterans’ Affairs. [Repealed.]

194.230.
Retention of rules, regulations, and contracts until modified or repealed by secretary.

Except as otherwise provided in 1974 Acts ch. 74, all rules, regulations, contracts, acts, agreements, determinations, and decisions of the Department of Child Welfare, the Department of Economic Security, the Department of Health, the Department of Mental Health, the Commission on Aging, the Commission on Children and Youth, the Commission for Handicapped Children, the Office of Economic Opportunity, the Division of Disability Determination of the Department of Education, and the Employment Agency Licensure Program of the Department of Labor shall remain in effect within the cabinet until duly modified or repealed by the secretary.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 24; 1980, ch. 118, § 9, effective July 15, 1980.

194.240.
Funds, assets, obligations, and resources transferred to cabinet.

All funds, credits, assets, appropriations, outstanding obligations, personnel, equipment, wards, any and all resources or other tangible property, and any business or other matter undertaken or vested in the Department of Child Welfare, the Department of Economic Security, the Department of Health, the Department of Mental Health, the Commission on Aging, the Commission on Children and Youth, the Commission for Handicapped Children, the Office of Economic Opportunity, the Division of Disability Determination of the Department of Education, and the Employment Agency Licensure Program of the Department of Labor are hereby transferred to and vested in the cabinet.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 25; 1980, ch. 118, § 10, effective July 15, 1980.

194.245.
Construction and operation of new facilities, beginning August 1, 1990 — Transfer of ownership and administration. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 482, § 29, effective July 13, 1990; 2000, ch. 330, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 149, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 146, § 18, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 12, effective July 12, 2012; repealed by 2020 ch. 36, § 44, effective July 15, 2020.

194.250.
Protection of records, files, and information.

All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or other writing in the possession of the Department of Child Welfare, the Department of Economic Security, the Department of Health, the Department of Mental Health, the Commission on Aging, the Commission on Children and Youth, the Commission for Handicapped Children, the Office of Economic Opportunity, the Division of Disability Determination of the Department of Education, and the Employment Agency Licensure Program of the Department of Labor and in the possession of all instrumentalities within or attached thereto shall remain in the custody of the cabinet. All confidential records, files, or information maintained in accordance with state or federal law or regulations or rules of court shall be retained in accordance with present law, regulations, or rules of court until modified or repealed or until the secretary establishes appropriate regulations to protect these records, files, and information.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 26; 1980, ch. 118, § 11, effective July 15, 1980.

194.260.
Pending business or other matters to be completed by cabinet.

Any business, litigation, or other matters undertaken or commenced by or against the Kidney Disease Advisory Council, the Family Planning Committee, the Tuberculosis Commission, the Kentucky Manpower Commission, the Kentucky Advisory Committee on Day Care, the Kentucky Children’s Advisory Council, the State Advisory Committee for Public Assistance, the Kentucky Commission on Employment of the Handicapped, the Advisory Committee to the Kentucky Commission on Employment of the Handicapped, the Advisory Council on Individuals with an Intellectual Disability, the Developmental Disabilities Act Advisory Council, the Kentucky Commission on Alcoholism and Drug Problems, the Commission on Aging, the Advisory Committee on Aging, the Commission on Handicapped Children, the Commission on Children and Youth, the State Board of Health, the Radiation Operators’ Advisory Committee, the Advisory Council for Medical Assistance, the Comprehensive Health Planning Council, and the Kentucky Certificate of Need and Licensure Board and still pending on June 21, 1974, shall be completed and conducted by the cabinet.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 27; 1976, ch. 299, § 41; 1980, ch. 118, § 12, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 399, § 12, effective July 15, 1982; 2012, ch. 146, § 19, effective July 12, 2012.

194.270.
Corporate bodies or instrumentalities to be attached to cabinet.

All corporate bodies or instrumentalities of the Commonwealth, advisory committees, commissions, councils, interstate compacts, or other statutory or executive order bodies attached to the functions in whole or in part of the Department of Child Welfare, the Department of Economic Security, the Department of Health, the Department of Mental Health, the Commission on Aging, the Commission on Children and Youth, the Commission for Handicapped Children, the Office of Economic Opportunity, the Division of Disability Determination of the Department of Education, and the Employment Agency Licensure Program of the Department of Labor shall be attached to the cabinet.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 28; 1980, ch. 118, § 13, effective July 15, 1980.

194.280.
Abolishment of certain departments, boards, and commissions.

Except as otherwise provided in 1974 Acts ch. 74, the following departments, boards, commissions, committees, and other statutory bodies and their subcommittees, task forces, advisory committees, bureaus, divisions, offices and other suborganizational units are abolished and terminated in their entirety: the Department of Economic Security, the Department of Health, the Department of Mental Health, the Department of Child Welfare, the Office of Economic Opportunity, the Bureau of Veterans Affairs, the Commission on Aging, the Commission for Handicapped Children, the Commission on Children and Youth, the Office of Youth Affairs, the State Board of Health, the Family Planning Committee, the Kidney Disease Advisory Committee, the Tuberculosis Commission, the Kentucky Manpower Council, the Kentucky Advisory Committee on Day Care, the Kentucky Children’s Advisory Council, the State Advisory Committee on Public Assistance, the Kentucky Commission on Employment of the Handicapped, the Advisory Council on Individuals with an Intellectual Disability, the Advisory Council on Mental Health, the Developmental Disabilities Services Act Advisory Council, the Kentucky Commission on Alcohol and Drug Problems, the Radiation Operators’ Advisory Committee, the Advisory Council for Health Facilities, the Human Resources Coordinating Commission, the Human Resources Coordinating Council, the Health Planning Commission, the Citizens’ Commission for Barkley State Boys’ Camp, the Citizens’ Commission for Woodsbend Boys’ Camp, the Citizens’ Commission for the State Reception Center at Lyndon.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 29; 2012, ch. 146, § 20, effective July 12, 2012.

194.290.
Office of geriatrics-gerontology — Administrator — Cooperation with educational institutions. [Repealed.]

194.350.
Liability insurance for physicians, hospital administrators, and directors employed by cabinet. [Repealed.]

194.360.
Annual report on committed children — Contents. [Repealed.]

194.370.
In-service training for social workers on child sexual abuse. [Repealed.]